Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB31.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "applicant" in section 302 of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person who, on his own behalf or on behalf of another, is applying for [permission to engage in any act or activity which is regulated under the provisions of] 123456789101112131415161718192021 registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this chapter. If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *Section 2. Section 311(b)(7.1) and (7.2) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 311. General and specific powers of board.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the following specific powers:* * *(7.1) [To require prospective and existing employees, independent contractors, applicants and licensees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police or an authorized agent of the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police or authorized agent of the Pennsylvania State Police shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes or verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.] In order to ensure the integrity of gaming-related activities in this Commonwealth, to require criminal history record checks for an individual who is a prospective employee, existing employee, independent contractor, applicant or licensee and seeks registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this chapter. The following shall apply:20250SB0031PN1025 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The individual must submit a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall check the fingerprints of the individual against records in the Pennsylvania State Police central repository for the purpose of obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(iii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit the fingerprints of the individual to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(iv) The Pennsylvania State Police shall forward the results of the criminal history record check to the board for the sole purpose of determining the individual 's eligibility for the registration, permit, certification, license, renewal or other qualification. The board may not disseminate the criminal history record check information to any other entity.(7.2) To require prospective and existing employees of the board, independent contractors of the board, applicants and licensees to submit photographs consistent with the standards established by the board.* * *Section 3. The definition of "applicant" in section 1103 of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 1103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250SB0031PN1025 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Applicant." [Any] A person who, on his own behalf or on behalf of another, is applying for [permission to engage in any act or activity which is regulated under the provisions of] registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this part. In cases in which the applicant is a person other than an individual, the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *Section 4. Section 1802 of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 1802. Submission of fingerprints and photographs.[Appointees, employees and prospective employees engaged in the service of the commissions or the board and applicants under this part shall submit to fingerprinting and photographing by the Pennsylvania State Police or by a local law enforcement agency capable of submitting fingerprints and photographs electronically to the Pennsylvania State Police utilizing the Integrated Automated Fingerprint Identification System and the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network or in a manner and in such form as may be provided by the Pennsylvania State Police. Fingerprinting pursuant to this part shall require, at a minimum, the submission of a full set of fingerprints. Photographing pursuant to this part shall require submission to photographs of the face and any scars, marks or tattoos for purposes of comparison utilizing an automated biometric imaging system. The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit fingerprints when requested by the commissions or the board to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity 20250SB0031PN1025 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the applicants and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions in order to prepare criminal history background investigations under section 1801 (relating to duty to provide). Fingerprints and photographs obtained pursuant to this part may be maintained by the commissions, the board and the Pennsylvania State Police for use pursuant to this part and for general law enforcement purposes. In addition to any other fee or cost assessed by the commissions or the board, an applicant shall pay for the cost of fingerprinting and photographing.] (a) Background check.--(1) In order to ensure the integrity of gaming-related activities in this Commonwealth, the board shall require criminal history record checks for an individual who is an appointee to the board, appointee to the commission, prospective employee, existing employee, independent contractor, applicant or licensee who seeks registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this part.(2) The individual shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall:(i) Check the fingerprints of the individual against records in the Pennsylvania State Police central repository for the purpose of obtaining a current criminal history record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(ii) Submit the fingerprints of the individual to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions.20250SB0031PN1025 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Forward the results of the criminal history record check to the board for the sole purpose of determining the individual's eligibility for the registration or permit, certification, license, qualification, credential or renewal under this part.(4) The board may not disseminate the criminal history record check information received under paragraph (3)(iii) to any other entity.(b) Photographs.--(1) An appointee, employee and prospective employee engaged in the service of the commission or the board and an applicant under this part shall submit to photographing by the Pennsylvania State Police or a local law enforcement agency capable of submitting photographs electronically to the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) Photographing under this subsection shall consist of taking images of the face and any scar, mark or tattoo for purposes of comparison utilizing an automated biometric imaging system.(3) Photographs obtained under this subsection may be maintained by the commission, the board and the Pennsylvania State Police for use under this part and for general law enforcement purposes.(c) Payment.--In addition to any other fee or cost assessed by the commission or the board, an applicant shall pay for the cost of fingerprinting and photographing under this section.Section 5. The definition of "applicant" in section 3102 of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall 20250SB0031PN1025 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Applicant." A person who, on his own behalf or on behalf of another, applies for [permission to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this part.] registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this part. If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the registration, permit, certification, license, qualification or other credential issued by the board of the applicant.* * *Section 6. Section 3301(b)(8) of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 3301. Powers of board.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the power and duty:* * *(8) [To require prospective and existing video gaming employees, independent contractors, applicants, permittees and licensees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee. The Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.] In order to ensure the integrity of gaming-related activities in this Commonwealth, to require criminal history record checks 20250SB0031PN1025 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for an individual who is a prospective employee, existing employee, independent contractor, applicant or licensee and seeks registration or a permit, certification, license, qualification, renewal or other credential issued by the board under this chapter. The following shall apply:(i) The individual must submit a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall check the fingerprints of the individual against records in the Pennsylvania State Police central repository for the purpose of obtaining a current criminal history record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(iii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit the fingerprints of the individual to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions.(iv) The Pennsylvania State Police shall forward the results of the criminal history record check to the board for the sole purpose of determining the individual's eligibility for the registration, permit, certification, license, renewal or other qualification. The board may not disseminate the criminal history record check information to any other entity.* * *Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0031PN1025 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526